Nebraska, session 109, LB1109.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-382, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-382 (1) The department shall prepare a tax expenditure report
describing (a) the basic provisions of the Nebraska tax laws, (b) the
actual or estimated revenue loss caused by the exemptions, deductions,
exclusions, deferrals, credits, and preferential rates in effect on July
1 of each year and allowed under Nebraska's tax structure and in the
property tax, (c) the actual or estimated revenue loss caused by failure
to impose sales and use tax on services purchased for nonbusiness use,
and (d) the elements which make up the tax base for state and local
income, including income, sales and use, property, and miscellaneous
taxes.
(2) The department shall review the major tax exemptions for which
state general funds are used to reduce the impact of revenue lost due to
a tax expenditure. The report shall indicate an estimate of the amount of
the reduction in revenue resulting from the operation of all tax
expenditures. The report shall list each tax expenditure relating to
sales and use tax under the following categories:
(a) Agriculture, which shall include a separate listing for the
following items: Agricultural machinery; agricultural chemicals; seeds
sold to commercial producers; water for irrigation and manufacturing;
commercial artificial insemination; mineral oil as dust suppressant;
animal grooming; oxygen for use in aquaculture; animal life whose
products constitute food for human consumption; and grains;
(b) Business across state lines, which shall include a separate
listing for the following items: Property shipped out-of-state;
fabrication labor for items to be shipped out-of-state; property to be
transported out-of-state; property purchased in other states to be used
in Nebraska; aircraft delivery to an out-of-state resident or business;
state reciprocal agreements for industrial machinery; and property taxed
in another state;
-2-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
(c) Common carrier and logistics, which shall include a separate
listing for the following items: Railroad rolling stock and repair parts
and services; common or contract carriers and repair parts and services;
common or contract carrier accessories; and common or contract carrier
safety equipment;
(d) Consumer goods, which shall include a separate listing for the
following items: Motor vehicles and motorboat trade-ins; merchandise
trade-ins; certain medical equipment and medicine; newspapers;
laundromats; telefloral deliveries; motor vehicle discounts for the
disabled; and political campaign fundraisers;
(e) Energy, which shall include a separate listing for the following
items: Motor fuels; energy used in industry; energy used in agriculture;
aviation fuel; and minerals, oil, and gas severed from real property;
(f) Food, which shall include a separate listing for the following
items: Food for home consumption; Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program; school lunches; meals sold by hospitals; meals sold by
institutions at a flat rate; food for the elderly, handicapped, and
Supplemental Security Income recipients; and meals sold by churches;
(g) General business, which shall include a separate listing for the
following items: Component and ingredient parts; manufacturing machinery;
containers; film rentals; molds and dies; syndicated programming;
intercompany sales; intercompany leases; sale of a business or farm
machinery; and transfer of property in a change of business ownership;
(h) Lodging and shelter, which shall include a separate listing for
the following item: Room rentals by certain institutions;
(i) Miscellaneous, which shall include a separate listing for the
following items: Cash discounts and coupons; separately stated finance
charges; casual sales; lease-to-purchase agreements; and separately
stated taxes;
(j) Nonprofits, governments, and exempt entities, which shall
include a separate listing for the following items: Purchases by
-3-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
political subdivisions of the state; purchases by churches and nonprofit
colleges and medical facilities; purchasing agents for public real estate
construction improvements; contractor as purchasing agent for public
agencies; Nebraska lottery; admissions to school events; sales on Native
American Indian reservations; school-supporting fundraisers; fine art
purchases by a museum; purchases by the Nebraska State Fair Board;
purchases by the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority and licensees of
the State Racing and Gaming Commission; purchases by the United States
Government; public records; and sales by religious organizations;
(k) Recent sales tax expenditures, which shall include a separate
listing for each sales tax expenditure created by statute or rule and
regulation after July 19, 2012;
(l) Services purchased for nonbusiness use, which shall include a
separate listing for each such service, including, but not limited to,
the following items: Motor vehicle cleaning, maintenance, and repair
services; cleaning and repair of clothing; cleaning, maintenance, and
repair of other tangible personal property; maintenance, painting, and
repair of real property; entertainment admissions; personal care
services; lawn care, gardening, and landscaping services; pet-related
services; storage and moving services; household utilities; other
personal services; taxi, limousine, and other transportation services;
legal services; accounting services; other professional services; and
other real estate services; and
(m) Telecommunications, which shall include a separate listing for
the following items: Telecommunications access charges; prepaid calling
arrangements; conference bridging services; and nonvoice data services.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that nothing in the Tax
Expenditure Reporting Act shall cause the valuation or assessment of any
property exempt from taxation on the basis of its use exclusively for
religious, educational, or charitable purposes.
Sec. 2. Section 77-2704.12, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-4-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
2024, is amended to read:
77-2704.12 (1) Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross
receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or
other consumption in this state of purchases by (a) any nonprofit
organization created exclusively for religious purposes, (b) any
nonprofit organization providing services exclusively to the blind, (c)
any nonprofit private educational institution established under sections
79-1601 to 79-1607, (d) any accredited, nonprofit, privately controlled
college or university with its primary campus physically located in
Nebraska, (e) any nonprofit (i) hospital, (ii) health clinic when one or
more hospitals or the parent corporations of the hospitals own or control
the health clinic for the purpose of reducing the cost of health services
or when the health clinic receives federal funds through the United
States Public Health Service for the purpose of serving populations that
are medically underserved, (iii) skilled nursing facility, (iv)
intermediate care facility, (v) assisted-living facility, (vi)
intermediate care facility for persons with developmental disabilities,
(vii) nursing facility, (viii) home health agency, (ix) hospice or
hospice service, (x) respite care service, (xi) mental health substance
use treatment center licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure
Act, or (xii) center for independent living as defined in 29 U.S.C. 796a,
(f) any nonprofit licensed residential child-caring agency, (g) any
nonprofit licensed child-placing agency, (h) any nonprofit organization
certified by the Department of Health and Human Services to provide
community-based services for persons with developmental disabilities, or
(i) any nonprofit organization certified or contracted by a regional
behavioral health authority or the Division of Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services to provide community-based mental
health or substance use services , or (j) any nonprofit organization for
purchases of property that will be transferred to an organization listed
in subdivisions (a) through (i) of this subsection until the property is
-5-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
transferred or the contract is completed, provided that the nonprofit
organization (i) acquires property that will be transferred to an
organization listed in subdivisions (a) through (i) of this subsection or
(ii) enters into a contract of construction, improvement, or repair upon
property annexed to real estate if the property will be transferred to an
organization listed in subdivisions (a) through (i) of this subsection.
(2) Any organization listed in subsection (1) of this section shall
apply for an exemption on forms provided by the Tax Commissioner. The
application shall be approved and a numbered certificate of exemption
received by the applicant organization in order to be exempt from the
sales and use tax.
(3) The appointment of purchasing agents shall be recognized for the
purpose of altering the status of the construction contractor as the
ultimate consumer of building materials which are physically annexed to
the structure and which subsequently belong to the owner of the
organization or institution. The appointment of purchasing agents shall
be in writing and occur prior to having any building materials annexed to
real estate in the construction, improvement, or repair. The contractor
who has been appointed as a purchasing agent may apply for a refund of or
use as a credit against a future use tax liability the tax paid on
inventory items annexed to real estate in the construction, improvement,
or repair of a project for a licensed not-for-profit institution.
(4) Any organization listed in subsection (1) of this section which
enters into a contract of construction, improvement, or repair upon
property annexed to real estate without first issuing a purchasing agent
authorization to a contractor or repairperson prior to the building
materials being annexed to real estate in the project may apply to the
Tax Commissioner for a refund of any sales and use tax paid by the
contractor or repairperson on the building materials physically annexed
to real estate in the construction, improvement, or repair.
(5) Any person purchasing, storing, using, or otherwise consuming
-6-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
building materials in the performance of any construction, improvement,
or repair by or for any institution enumerated in subsection (1) of this
section which is licensed upon completion although not licensed at the
time of construction or improvement, which building materials are annexed
to real estate and which subsequently belong to the owner of the
institution, shall pay any applicable sales or use tax thereon. Upon
becoming licensed and receiving a numbered certificate of exemption, the
institution organized not for profit shall be entitled to a refund of the
amount of taxes so paid in the performance of such construction,
improvement, or repair and shall submit whatever evidence is required by
the Tax Commissioner sufficient to establish the total sales and use tax
paid upon the building materials physically annexed to real estate in the
construction, improvement, or repair.
Sec. 3. Section 77-2704.15, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2704.15 (1)(a) Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the
gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use,
or other consumption in this state of purchases by the state, including
public educational institutions recognized or established under the
provisions of Chapter 85, or by any county, township, city, village,
rural or suburban fire protection district, city airport authority,
county airport authority, joint airport authority, drainage district
organized under sections 31-401 to 31-450, sanitary drainage district
organized under sections 31-501 to 31-553, land bank created under the
Nebraska Municipal Land Bank Act, natural resources district, county
agricultural society, elected county fair board, housing agency as
defined in section 71-1575 except for purchases for any commercial
operation that does not exclusively benefit the residents of an
affordable housing project, cemetery created under section 12-101, or
joint entity or agency formed by any combination of two or more counties,
townships, cities, villages, or other exempt governmental units pursuant
-7-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
to the Interlocal Cooperation Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management
Act, or the Joint Public Agency Act, except for purchases for use in the
business of furnishing gas, water, electricity, or heat, or by any
irrigation or reclamation district, the irrigation division of any public
power and irrigation district, or public schools or learning communities
established under Chapter 79.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, purchases by the state or by a
governmental unit listed in subdivision (a) of this subsection include
purchases by any nonprofit corporation under a lease-purchase agreement,
financing lease, or other instrument which provides for transfer of title
to the property to the state or governmental unit upon payment of all
amounts due thereunder. If any nonprofit corporation will be making
purchases under a lease-purchase agreement, financing lease, or other
instrument as part of a project with a total estimated cost that exceeds
the threshold amount, then such purchases shall qualify for an exemption
under this section only if the question of proceeding with such project
has been submitted at a primary, general, or special election held within
the governmental unit that will be a party to the lease-purchase
agreement, financing lease, or other instrument and has been approved by
the voters of such governmental unit or the governmental unit's
expenditure towards the project is paid in whole or in part with
redevelopment bonds. For purposes of this subdivision, (i) project means
the acquisition of real property or the construction of a public building
and (ii) threshold amount means the greater of fifty thousand dollars or
six-tenths of one percent of the total actual value of real and personal
property of the governmental unit that will be a party to the lease-
purchase agreement, financing lease, or other instrument as of the end of
the governmental unit's prior fiscal year.
(2) The appointment of purchasing agents shall be recognized for the
purpose of altering the status of the construction contractor as the
ultimate consumer of building materials which are physically annexed to
-8-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
the structure and which subsequently belong to the state or the
governmental unit. The appointment of purchasing agents shall be in
writing and occur prior to having any building materials annexed to real
estate in the construction, improvement, or repair. The contractor who
has been appointed as a purchasing agent may apply for a refund of or use
as a credit against a future use tax liability the tax paid on inventory
items annexed to real estate in the construction, improvement, or repair
of a project for the state or a governmental unit.
(3) Any governmental unit listed in subsection (1) of this section,
except the state, which enters into a contract of construction,
improvement, or repair upon property annexed to real estate without first
issuing a purchasing agent authorization to a contractor or repairperson
prior to the building materials being annexed to real estate in the
project may apply to the Tax Commissioner for a refund of any sales and
use tax paid by the contractor or repairperson on the building materials
physically annexed to real estate in the construction, improvement, or
repair.
Sec. 4. Section 77-2704.46, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2704.46 Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross
receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or
other consumption in this state of:
(1) Any form of animal life of a kind the products of which
ordinarily constitute food for human consumption. Animal life includes
live poultry , other species of game birds subject to permit and
regulation by the Game and Parks Commission, and livestock on the hoof
when sales are made by the grower, producer, feeder, or any person
engaged in the business of bartering, buying, or selling live poultry ,
other species of game birds subject to permit and regulation by the Game
and Parks Commission, or livestock on the hoof;
(2) Seeds and annual plants, the products of which ordinarily
-9-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
constitute food for human consumption and which seeds and annual plants
are sold to commercial producers of such products, and seed legumes, seed
grasses, and seed grains when sold to be used exclusively for
agricultural purposes;
(3) Agricultural chemicals, adjuvants, surfactants, bonding agents,
clays, oils, and any other additives or compatibility agents for use in
commercial agriculture and applied to land or crops and sold in any tax
period that has not been closed by the applicable statute of limitations.
Agricultural chemicals does not mean chemicals, adjuvants, surfactants,
bonding agents, clays, oils, and any other additives or compatibility
agents applied to harvested grains stored in commercial elevators; or
(4) Oxygen for use in aquaculture as defined in section 2-3804.01.
Sec. 5. Section 77-27,235, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-27,235 (1) Beginning on or after July 14, 2006, and before July
1, 2026, any Any producer of electricity generated by a new renewable
electric generation facility shall earn a renewable energy tax credit.
For electricity generated on or after July 14, 2006, and before October
1, 2007, the credit shall be .075 cent for each kilowatt-hour of
electricity generated by a new renewable electric generation facility.
For electricity generated on or after October 1, 2007, and before January
1, 2010, the credit shall be .1 cent for each kilowatt-hour of
electricity generated by a new renewable electric generation facility.
For electricity generated on or after January 1, 2010, and before January
1, 2013, the credit shall be .075 cent per kilowatt-hour for electricity
generated by a new renewable electric generation facility. For
electricity generated on or after January 1, 2013, and before July 1,
2026, the credit shall be .05 cent per kilowatt-hour for electricity
generated by a new renewable electric generation facility. The credit may
be earned for production of electricity for ten years after the date that
the facility is placed in operation on or after July 14, 2006.
-10-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Electricity generated by a new renewable electric generation
facility means electricity that is exclusively produced by a new
renewable electric generation facility;
(b) Eligible renewable resources means wind, moving water, solar,
geothermal, fuel cell, methane gas, or photovoltaic technology; and
(c) New renewable electric generation facility means an electrical
generating facility located in this state that is first placed into
service on or after July 14, 2006, which utilizes eligible renewable
resources as its fuel source.
(3) The credit allowed under this section may be used to reduce the
producer's Nebraska income tax liability or to obtain a refund of state
sales and use taxes paid by the producer of electricity generated by a
new renewable electric generation facility. A claim to use the credit for
refund of the state sales and use taxes paid, either directly or
indirectly, by the producer may be filed quarterly for electricity
generated during the previous quarter by the twentieth day of the month
following the end of the calendar quarter. The credit may be used to
obtain a refund of state sales and use taxes paid during the quarter
immediately preceding the quarter in which the claim for refund is made,
except that the amount refunded under this subsection shall not exceed
the amount of the state sales and use taxes paid during the quarter.
(4) The Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to permit verification of the validity and timeliness of any
renewable energy tax credit claimed.
(5) The total amount of renewable energy tax credits that may be
used by all taxpayers shall be limited to fifty thousand dollars without
further authorization from the Legislature.
(6) The credit allowed under this section may not be claimed by a
producer who received a sales tax exemption under section 77-2704.57, as
such section existed on June 30, 2026, for the new renewable electric
-11-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
generation facility.
(7) Interest shall not be allowed on any refund paid under this
section.
Sec. 6. Section 77-5804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-5804 (1) The credit allowed under section 77-5803 may be used (a)
to obtain a refund of state sales and use taxes paid or (b) , may be used
against the income tax liability of the taxpayer. , or may be used as a
refundable credit claimed on an income tax return of the taxpayer. The
return need not reflect any income tax liability owed by the taxpayer.
(2) A claim for the credit may be filed quarterly for refund of the
state sales and use taxes paid, either directly or indirectly, after the
filing of the income tax return for the tax year in which the credit was
first allowed.
(3) The credit may be used to obtain a refund of state sales and use
taxes paid before the end of the tax year for which the credit was
allowed, except that the amount refunded under this subsection shall not
exceed the amount of the state sales and use taxes paid, either directly
or indirectly, by the taxpayer on the qualifying expenditures.
(4) Credits distributed to a partner, limited liability company
member, shareholder, or beneficiary may be used against the income tax
liability of the partner, member, shareholder, or beneficiary receiving
the credits.
(5) Interest shall not be allowed on any taxes refunded under the
Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act.
Sec. 7. Section 77-6818, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6818 (1) Qualified location means a location at which the
majority of the business activities conducted are within one or more of
the following NAICS codes or the following descriptions:
(a) Manufacturing - 31, 32, or 33, including pre-production
-12-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
services;
(b) Testing Laboratories - 541380;
(c) Rail Transportation - 482;
(d) Truck Transportation - 484;
(e) Insurance Carriers - 5241;
(f) Wired Telecommunications Carriers - 517311;
(g) Wireless Telecommunications Carriers (except Satellite) -
517312;
(h) Telemarketing Bureaus and Other Contact Centers - 561422;
(i) Data Processing, Hosting, and Related Services - 518210;
(j) Computer Facilities Management Services - 541513;
(k) Warehousing and Storage - 4931;
(l) The administrative management of the taxpayer's activities,
including headquarter facilities relating to such activities, or the
administrative management of any of the activities of any business entity
or entities in which the taxpayer or a group of its owners hold any
direct or indirect ownership interest of at least ten percent, including
headquarter facilities relating to such activities;
(m) Logistics Facilities - Portions of NAICS 488210, 488310, and
488490 dealing with independently operated trucking terminals,
independently operated railroad and railway terminals, and waterfront
terminal and port facility operations;
(n) Services provided on aircraft brought into this state by an
individual who is a resident of another state or any other person who has
a business location in another state when the aircraft is not to be
registered or based in this state and will not remain in this state more
than ten days after the service is completed;
(o) The conducting of research, development, or testing, or any
combination thereof, for scientific, agricultural, animal husbandry, food
product, industrial, or technology purposes;
(p) The production of electricity by using one or more sources of
-13-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
renewable energy to produce electricity for sale. For purposes of this
subdivision, sources of renewable energy includes, but is not limited to,
wind, solar, energy storage, geothermal, hydroelectric, biomass, nuclear,
and transmutation of elements;
(q) Computer Systems Design and Related Services - 5415;
(r) The performance of financial services. For purposes of this
subdivision, financial services includes only financial services provided
by any financial institution subject to tax under Chapter 77, article 38,
or any person or entity licensed by the Department of Banking and Finance
or the federal Securities and Exchange Commission;
(s) Postharvest Crop Activities (except Cotton Ginning) - 115114; or
(t) The processing of tangible personal property. For purposes of
this subdivision, processing means to subject to a particular method,
system, or technique of preparation, handling, or other treatment
designed to prepare tangible personal property for market, manufacture,
or other commercial use which does not result in the transformation of
such property into a substantially different character. ; or
(u) Waste Treatment and Disposal - 5622.
(2)(a) Qualified location also includes any other business location
if at least seventy-five percent of the revenue derived at the location
is from sales to customers who are not related persons which are
delivered or provided from the qualified location to a location that is
not within Nebraska according to the sourcing rules in subsections (2)
and (3) of section 77-2734.14. Intermediate sales to related persons are
included as sales to customers delivered or provided to a location
outside Nebraska if the related person delivers or provides the goods or
services to a location outside Nebraska. Even if a location meets the
seventy-five percent requirement of this subdivision, such location shall
not constitute a qualified location under this subdivision if the
majority of the business activities conducted at such location are within
any of the following NAICS codes or any combination thereof:
-14-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
(i) Agriculture, Forestry, Fishing and Hunting - 11, excluding NAICS
code 115114;
(ii) Transportation and Warehousing - 48-49;
(iii) Information - 51;
(iv) Utilities - 22;
(v) Mining, Quarrying, and Oil and Gas Extraction - 21;
(vi) Public Administration - 92; or
(vii) Construction - 23.
(b) The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
establishing an alternative method in circumstances in which subdivision
(2)(a) of this section does not accurately reflect the out-of-state sales
taking place at locations within Nebraska for a particular industry.
(3) The determination of the majority of the business activities
shall be made based on the number of employees working in the respective
business activities. The director may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations establishing an alternative method in circumstances in which
other factors provide a better reflection of business activities.
(4) The delineation of the types of business activities which enable
a location to constitute a qualified location is based on the state's
intention to attract certain types of business activities and to
responsibly accomplish the purposes of the ImagiNE Nebraska Act by
directing the state's incentive capabilities towards business activities
which, due to their national nature, could locate outside of Nebraska and
which therefore would, through the use of incentives, be motivated to
locate in Nebraska. By listing specific types of business activities in
subsection (1) of this section, the state has determined such business
activities by their nature meet these objectives. By specifying the
national nature of a taxpayer's revenue in subsection (2) of this
section, the state has determined that certain other types of business
activities can meet these objectives.
Sec. 8. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
-15-

LB1109 LB1109
2026 2026
Sec. 9. Original sections 77-2704.46, 77-27,235, and 77-5804,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 77-382, 77-2704.12,
77-2704.15, and 77-6818, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
are repealed.
Sec. 10. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
77-2701.54, 77-2704.57, 77-2704.60, 77-2704.61, and 77-2704.62, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
Sec. 11. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-16-